Alabama, session 2026rs, HB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) High Socks for Hope is exempt from
paying state sales and use taxes.
(b) Any county or municipality may exempt this entity
from the payment of county or municipal sales and use taxes in
accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB398 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................05-Feb-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Ways and Means
Education

Read for the second time and placed ................12-Feb-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................11-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 103
Nays 0
Abstains 0


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 2